Washington statutes.
RCW 11.98.014

Trust creation—Oral trusts.

Except as required by a statute other than this title, a trust need not be evidenced by a trust instrument, but the creation of an oral trust and its terms may be established only by clear, cogent, and convincing evidence.

[ 2011 c 327 s 19.]

NOTES:

Application—Effective date—2011 c 327: See notes following RCW 11.103.020.